District of Columbia statutes.
8-108.04

Penalties.

(a)

A violation of this subchapter shall be a civil infraction for purposes of Chapter 18 of Title 2 [§  2-1801.01 et seq.]. Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this subchapter, or the rules issued under authority of this subchapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2 [§ 2-1801.01 et seq.]. Adjudication of any infractions shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2 [§  2-1801.01 et seq.]. This section shall not limit the enforcement of subchapter IV of this chapter [§ 8-107.02].

(b)

Pursuant to § 8-108.05, the Mayor shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this section 90 days after March 31, 2011.

Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-336, § 5, 58 DCR 605

History